Vermont, session 2025-2026, S192.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 24 V.S.A. § 2291 is amended to read:
§ 2291. ENUMERATION OF POWERS
For the purpose of promoting the public health, safety, welfare, and
convenience, a town, city, or incorporated village shall have the following
powers:
* * *
VT LEG #385947 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.192
2026 Page 2 of 3
(13)(A) To establish health and safety standards for premises within the
municipality and compel the cleaning or repair of any premises that in the
judgment of:
(i) the legislative body determines to be vacant, blighted, or
damaging to the general appearance of the municipality;
(ii) may injure other property in the vicinity; or
(iii) is dangerous to the health or safety of the public and to
establish health and safety standards for premises within the municipality in
order to protect the public or prevent physical injury to other properties in the
vicinity.
(B) To control the removal of rubbish, waste, and objectionable
material from any premises that is subject to this subdivision (13).
(C) To clean or repair any premises that is subject to this subdivision
(13) and recover all expenses incident to the cleaning or repair. The expenses
incurred shall constitute a lien on the property in the same manner and to the
same extent as taxes assessed on the grand list. All procedures and remedies
for the collection of taxes shall apply to the collection of expenses pursuant to
this subdivision (13). Prior to incurring any expenses pursuant to this
subdivision (C), the town, city, or incorporated village shall adopt rules
governing the compelled cleaning or repair of a premises, including provisions
VT LEG #385947 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.192
2026 Page 3 of 3
for an administrative appeals process and notice pursuant to 32 V.S.A.
§ 5252(a)(3).
* * *
(24) Upon the determination by a municipal building inspector, health
officer, or fire marshal that a building within the boundaries of the town, city,
or incorporated village is uninhabitable, to recover all expenses incident to the
maintenance of the uninhabitable building with the expenses to constitute a
lien on the property in the same manner and to the same extent as taxes
assessed on the grand list, and all procedures and remedies for the collection of
taxes shall apply to the collection of those expenses; provided, however, that
the town, city, or incorporated village has adopted rules to determine the
habitability of a building, including provisions for notice in accordance with 32
V.S.A. § 5252(3) 5252(a)(3) to the building’s owner prior to incurring
expenses and including provisions for an administrative appeals process.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385947 v.1